Nevada, session 83, AB346.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:

Section 1. Chapter 440 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A coroner, coroner’s deputy or local health officer is not
required to certify the cause of death of a patient who dies after
self-administering a medication that is designed to end the life of
the patient in accordance with the provisions of sections 5 to 33,
inclusive, of this act.
2. A coroner, coroner’s deputy or local health officer may
access any records or information submitted to the Division of
Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and
Human Services pursuant to section 27 of this act to confirm that
a patient died from self-administering a medication that is
designed to end the life of the patient in accordance with the
provisions of sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 440.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
440.350 [The]
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the certificate
of death or of stillbirth that shall be used is the standard form
approved by the United States Public Health Service.
2. The certificate of death must contain a box that may be
marked to indicate that a patient died after self-administering a
medication that is designed to end his or her life in accordance
with sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 2. NRS 440.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
440.380 1. The medical certificate of death must be signed
by the physician or advanced practice registered nurse, if any, last in
attendance on the deceased, or pursuant to regulations adopted by
the Board, it may be signed by the attending physician’s associate
physician, the chief medical officer of the hospital or institution in
which the death occurred, or the pathologist who performed an
autopsy upon the deceased. The person who signs the medical
certificate of death shall specify:
(a) The social security number of the deceased.
(b) The hour and day on which the death occurred.
(c) The cause of death, so as to show the cause of disease or
sequence of causes resulting in death, giving first the primary cause
of death or the name of the disease causing death, and the
contributory or secondary cause, if any, and the duration of each.
2. In deaths in hospitals or institutions, or of nonresidents, the
physician or advanced practice registered nurse shall furnish the
information required under this section, and may state where, in his
or her opinion, the disease was contracted.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 6 –
3. The medical certificate of death of a patient who dies after
self-administering a medication that is designed to end the life of
the patient in accordance with sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this
act:
(a) Must specify the terminal condition with which the patient
was diagnosed as the cause of death;
(b) Must not indicate suicide as the cause of death; and
(c) Must indicate that the patient died after self-administering
a medication that is designed to end his or her life through a mark
in the box included in the certificate of death pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 440.350.
Sec. 3. NRS 440.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
440.420 1. In case of any death occurring without medical
attendance, the funeral director shall notify the local health officer,
coroner or coroner’s deputy of such death and refer the case to the
local health officer, coroner or coroner’s deputy . [for immediate
investigation and certification.] Except as otherwise provided in
NRS 259.050 and section 1 of this act, the coroner, coroner’s
deputy or local health officer shall immediately investigate the
death and certify the cause of death.
2. Where there is no qualified physician or advanced practice
registered nurse in attendance, and in such cases only, the local
health officer is authorized to make the certificate and return from
the statements of relatives or other persons having adequate
knowledge of the facts.
3. If the death was caused by unlawful or suspicious means, the
local health officer shall then refer the case to the coroner for
investigation and certification.
4. In counties which have adopted an ordinance authorizing a
coroner’s examination in cases of sudden infant death syndrome, the
funeral director shall notify the local health officer whenever the
cause or suspected cause of death is sudden infant death syndrome.
The local health officer shall then refer the case to the coroner for
investigation and certification.
5. The coroner or the coroner’s deputy may certify the cause of
death in any case which is referred to the coroner by the local health
officer or pursuant to a local ordinance.
Sec. 4. Chapter 449A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 5. As used in sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 6 to 16, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 7 –
Sec. 6. “Advanced practice registered nurse” means a
registered nurse who holds a valid license as an advanced practice
registered nurse issued by the State Board of Nursing pursuant to
NRS 632.237.
Sec. 7. “Attending practitioner” means the practitioner who
has primary responsibility for the treatment of a terminal
condition from which a patient suffers.
Sec. 8. “Consulting practitioner” means a practitioner to
whom a patient is referred pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection
1 of section 20 of this act for confirmation of the diagnosis and
prognosis of the patient and that the patient meets the
requirements of subsections 3, 4 and 5 of section 17 of this act.
Sec. 9. “Division” means the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human
Services.
Sec. 10. “Health care facility” means any facility licensed
pursuant to chapter 449 of NRS.
Sec. 11. “Mentally capable” means that a patient has the
ability to make, communicate and understand the nature and
consequences of the decision to request and self-administer a
medication that is designed to end the life of the patient.
Sec. 12. “Person professionally qualified in the field of
psychiatric mental health” means:
1. A psychiatrist licensed to practice medicine in the State of
Nevada and certified by the American Board of Psychiatry and
Neurology;
2. A psychologist licensed to practice in this State;
3. A social worker who holds a master’s degree in social
work, is licensed by the State as a clinical social worker and is
employed by the Division;
4. A registered nurse who:
(a) Is licensed to practice professional nursing in this State;
and
(b) Holds a master’s degree in the field of psychiatric nursing;
and
(c) Is employed by the Division; and
5. A clinical professional counselor licensed pursuant to
chapter 641A of NRS.
Sec. 13. “Physician” means a person who is licensed to
practice medicine pursuant to chapter 630 of NRS or osteopathic
medicine pursuant to chapter 633 of NRS.
Sec. 14. “Practitioner” means a physician or advanced
practice registered nurse.
Sec. 15. “Self-administer” or “self-administration” means
the ingestion by a person of a medication that is designed to end
-
*AB346_R1*

– 8 –
his or her life as an affirmative, conscious and voluntary act. The
term does not include the administration of the medication by
parenteral injection or infusion.
Sec. 16. “Terminal condition” means an incurable and
irreversible condition that will, in accordance with reasonable
medical judgment, result in death within 6 months.
Sec. 17. A patient may request that his or her attending
practitioner prescribe a medication that is designed to end the life
of the patient if the patient:
1. Is at least 18 years of age;
2. Has been diagnosed with a terminal condition by the
attending practitioner and at least one consulting practitioner;
3. Has made an informed and voluntary decision to end his
or her own life;
4. Is mentally capable; and
5. Is not requesting the medication because of coercion,
deception or undue influence.
Sec. 18. 1. A patient who wishes to obtain a prescription for
a medication that is designed to end his or her life must:
(a) Make two verbal requests for the medication to his or her
attending practitioner. Except as otherwise provided in this
paragraph, the second verbal request must be made at least 15
days after the first verbal request. If the attending practitioner
determines that the patient is reasonably likely to die within 15
days after the first verbal request, the patient may make the second
verbal request at any time.
(b) Make a written request for the medication in the form
prescribed by section 19 of this act and submit the written request
to the attending practitioner. The written request for the
medication must be signed by the patient and one witness, who
must not be:
(1) Related to the patient by blood, marriage or adoption;
(2) Entitled to any portion of the estate of the patient upon
death under a will or by operation of law;
(3) An owner, operator or employee of a health care facility
where the patient is receiving treatment or is a resident;
(4) The attending practitioner; or
(5) An interpreter for the patient.
2. An oral or written request made pursuant to this section
may not be made:
(a) By any person acting on behalf of the patient, including,
without limitation, a surrogate, supporter, guardian or person
designated in a power of attorney to make decisions concerning
health care pursuant to NRS 162A.790.
(b) In an advance directive.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 9 –
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Advance directive” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449A.703.
(b) “Supporter” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 162C.090.
Sec. 19. A written request for a medication that is designed to
end the life of a patient must be in substantially the following
form:

REQUEST FOR A MEDICATION
THAT IS DESIGNED TO END MY LIFE

I, ....................................., am an adult of sound mind.

I have been diagnosed with ..............................................
and given a prognosis of less than 6 months to live.

I have been fully informed of my diagnosis, my
prognosis and the feasible alternative, concurrent or
additional treatment opportunities, including comfort care,
hospice care and pain control. I have been offered resources
or referrals to pursue these alternative, concurrent or
additional treatment opportunities.

I have been fully informed of the nature of the
medication to be prescribed to me and the risks and benefits
of self-administering the medication, including that the
likely effect of self-administering the medication is death. I
understand that I can rescind this request at any time and
that I am under no obligation to fill the prescription once it
is written or to self-administer the medication if I obtain it.

I request that my attending practitioner prescribe a
medication that I may self-administer to end my life and
authorize my attending practitioner to contact a pharmacist
to fill the prescription at a time of my choosing.

I make this request voluntarily, free from coercion or
undue influence.

Signed: ..........................................................................

Dated: ............................................................................

Witness signature: ........................................................
-
*AB346_R1*

– 10 –
Date: ..............................................................................
Sec. 20. 1. Before prescribing a medication that is designed
to end the life of a patient, the attending practitioner of the patient
must:
(a) Inform the patient that he or she may revoke a request for
the medication at any time and provide the patient with the
opportunity to revoke his or her second verbal request made
pursuant to subsection 1 of section 18 of this act;
(b) Determine and verify, after each verbal and written request
for the medication made pursuant to subsection 1 of section 18 of
this act and immediately before writing the prescription, that the
patient meets the requirements of subsections 3, 4 and 5 of section
17 of this act;
(c) Discuss with the patient:
(1) The diagnosis and prognosis of the patient;
(2) All available methods of treating or managing the
terminal condition of the patient, including, without limitation,
comfort care, hospice care and pain control, and the risks and
benefits of each method;
(3) The risks and benefits of self-administering the
medication, including, without limitation, that death is the
probable result of self-administering the medication;
(4) The recommended procedure for self-administering the
medication;
(5) The manner in which the medication must be kept and
disposed of in accordance with applicable state and federal law;
(6) The importance of having another person present when
the patient self-administers the medication; and
(7) The benefits of notifying the patient’s next of kin of his
or her decision to request a prescription for a medication that is
designed to end the life of the patient;
(d) Refer the patient to a consulting practitioner who is
qualified by reason of specialty or experience to diagnose the
terminal condition of the patient for examination and receive
written confirmation from that practitioner of the diagnosis and
prognosis of the patient and that the patient meets the
requirements of subsections 3, 4 and 5 of section 17 of this act;
(e) Inform the patient that there is no obligation to fill the
prescription or to self-administer the medication, if obtained; and
(f) Instruct the patient against self-administering the
medication in a public place. As used in this paragraph, “public
place” means any location readily accessible to the general public,
but does not include a health care facility.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 11 –
2. The attending practitioner shall refer the patient for
comfort care, palliative care, hospice care, pain control or other
end-of-life care if requested or as clinically indicated.
Sec. 21. 1. If the attending practitioner to whom a patient
makes a request for a medication that is designed to end the life of
the patient or the consulting practitioner to whom a patient is
referred pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 of section 20 of
this act determines that the patient may not be mentally capable:
(a) The attending practitioner or consulting practitioner, as
applicable, must refer the patient for examination by a person
professionally qualified in the field of psychiatric mental health;
and
(b) The attending practitioner must not prescribe a medication
that is designed to end the life of the patient, unless the person
professionally qualified in the field of psychiatric mental health
concludes, based on the examination, that the patient is mentally
capable.
2. If a patient is examined pursuant to subsection 1, the
person professionally qualified in the field of psychiatric mental
health must provide to the attending practitioner and, if
applicable, the consulting practitioner who made the referral, his
or her written determination regarding whether the patient is
mentally capable.
Sec. 22. 1. Except as otherwise provided in section 23 of
this act, the attending practitioner of a patient may prescribe a
medication that is designed to end the life of the patient after the
attending practitioner has ensured that the requirements of
sections 17 to 21, inclusive, of this act have been met.
2. After an attending practitioner prescribes a medication
that is designed to end the life of a patient, the attending
practitioner shall, after obtaining the written consent of the
patient, contact a pharmacist and inform the pharmacist of the
prescription. After the pharmacist has been notified, the attending
practitioner shall transmit the prescription directly to the
pharmacist.
3. A medication that is designed to end the life of a patient
may only be dispensed by a registered pharmacist or by the
attending practitioner of the patient. A pharmacist may only
dispense such a medication pursuant to a valid prescription
provided by an attending practitioner in accordance with
subsection 2 to:
(a) The patient;
(b) The attending practitioner who prescribed the medication;
or
-
*AB346_R1*

– 12 –
(c) An agent of the patient who has been expressly identified to
the pharmacist as such by the patient.
Sec. 22.5. When billing a patient or his or her insurer for
services in connection with prescribing a medication that is
designed to end the life of the patient, an attending practitioner
may only bill the patient or his or her insurer using the
appropriate coding found in the current edition of the Current
Procedural Terminology published by the American Medical
Association for:
1. Diagnosing the patient; and
2. Prescribing the medication that is designed to end the life
of the patient.
Sec. 23. An attending practitioner shall not prescribe a
medication that is designed to end the life of a patient based solely
on the age or disability of the patient.
Sec. 24. 1. The attending practitioner of a patient who
requests a medication that is designed to end the life of the patient
shall document in the medical record of the patient:
(a) Each request for such a medication made by the patient,
including, without limitation, by including in the record a copy of
the written request submitted pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 of section 18 of this act, and each revocation of such
a request;
(b) The diagnosis and the prognosis of the patient provided by
the attending practitioner;
(c) Each determination made by the attending practitioner
concerning whether the patient meets the requirements of
subsections 3, 4 and 5 of section 17 of this act;
(d) Confirmation that:
(1) The attending practitioner offered the patient the
opportunity to revoke his or her second verbal request for the
medication, as required by subsection 1 of section 20 of this act;
and
(2) The requirements set forth in sections 5 to 33, inclusive,
of this act have been satisfied; and
(e) The name, amount and dosage of any medication that is
designed to end the life of the patient and any ancillary
medications that the attending practitioner prescribes for the
patient.
2. A consulting practitioner shall report to the attending
practitioner of the patient and document in the medical record of
the patient his or her:
(a) Confirmation that the patient has requested a medication
designed to end the life of the patient;
-
*AB346_R1*

– 13 –
(b) Diagnosis and opinion regarding the prognosis of the
patient; and
(c) Determination concerning whether the patient meets the
requirements of subsections 3, 4 and 5 of section 17 of this act.
3. A person professionally qualified in the field of psychiatric
mental health to whom a patient is referred pursuant to section 21
of this act shall document in the medical record of the patient his
or her determination of whether the patient is mentally capable.
4. If a patient who has requested a medication that is
designed to end his or her life changes his or her attending
practitioner or transfers his or her care to a different health care
facility, the prior attending practitioner and health care facility, as
applicable, must, upon the request of the patient or the new
attending practitioner or health care facility, forward the medical
records of the patient to the new attending practitioner or health
care facility, as applicable.
Sec. 25. 1. A patient who requests a medication that is
designed to end his or her life may revoke the request at any time,
without regard to his or her age or physical or mental condition.
2. The revocation of a request for such a medication becomes
effective immediately upon the patient communicating the
revocation to his or her attending practitioner. When the patient
revokes such a request, the attending practitioner must document
the revocation in the medical record of the patient.
Sec. 26. 1. Only a patient to whom a medication that is
designed to end his or her life is prescribed may administer the
medication. No other person may administer the medication to the
patient, including, without limitation, by parenteral injection or
infusion. Any person who is present may assist the patient in
preparing the medication for self-administration.
2. If any amount of a medication that is designed to end the
life of a patient is not self-administered, it must be disposed of in
accordance with law.
Sec. 27. 1. An attending practitioner who prescribes a
medication that is designed to end the life of a patient shall:
(a) Not more than 30 days after prescribing the medication,
provide to the Division in the form prescribed by the Division the
name, date of birth, diagnosis and prognosis of the patient and
affirmation that the prescription was issued in accordance with
the provisions of sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this act; and
(b) Not more than 60 days after the death of a patient from
administering the medication, provide to the Division the name
and date of birth of the patient, the date on which the patient died
and a statement of whether the patient was receiving hospice care
at the time of death.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 14 –
2. The Division shall prescribe forms for reporting each set of
information required by subsection 1.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115 and
sections 1 and 28 of this act, any information or records submitted
to the Division pursuant to this section are confidential.
4. The Division shall annually review a sample of the reports
submitted pursuant to subsection 1 to ensure compliance with the
requirements of that subsection.
5. The provisions of subsection 1 of section 33 of this act do
not apply to a practitioner who willfully fails to comply with the
requirements of this section.
Sec. 28. On or before February 1 of each year, the Division
shall:
1. Compile a report concerning the implementation of the
provisions of sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this act. The report:
(a) Must include, for the immediately preceding calendar year:
(1) The number of patients to whom a medication that is
designed to end the life of a patient was prescribed;
(2) The number of patients described in subparagraph (1)
who died after self-administering the medication and the terminal
conditions which were specified as the cause of those deaths; and
(3) The number of practitioners who prescribed a
medication that is designed to end the life of a patient.
(b) Must not include the personally identifiable information of
any patient or provider of health care.
2. Make the report compiled pursuant to subsection 1 publicly
available on the Internet website maintained by the Division.
Sec. 29. 1. A death resulting from a patient self-
administering a medication that is designed to end his or her life
in accordance with the provisions of sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of
this act does not constitute mercy killing, euthanasia, assisted
suicide, suicide or homicide.
2. Any report or other document produced by this State, any
political subdivision of this State or any agency, board,
commission, department, officer, employee or agent of this State
must refer to a request for, acquisition of, prescription of,
dispensing of and self-administration of a medication that is
designed to end the life of a patient as a request for, acquisition of,
prescription of, dispensing of and self-administration, as
applicable, of a medication that is designed to end the life of a
patient.
Sec. 30. 1. A person shall not prevent a patient from
making or revoking or require a patient to make or revoke a
request for a medication that is designed to end the life of the
patient as a condition of receiving health care.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 15 –
2. Any provision in any contract or agreement entered into
before, on or after the effective date of this act, whether written or
oral, that would affect the right of a patient to take any action in
accordance with the provisions of sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of
this act is unenforceable and void.
Sec. 31. 1. The provisions of sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of
this act do not:
(a) Require an attending practitioner to prescribe a medication
that is designed to end the life of a patient or require a pharmacist
to fill a prescription for or dispense such a medication;
(b) Affect the responsibility of a practitioner to provide
information and treatment in accordance with the standard of
care, including, without limitation, treatment for a patient’s
comfort or alleviation of pain; or
(c) Condone, authorize or approve mercy killing, euthanasia
or assisted suicide.
2. An attending practitioner shall provide a patient who is
diagnosed with a terminal condition with complete and accurate
information concerning his or her available options for care and
the risks and benefits of each option. If an attending practitioner
is unwilling or unable to provide information concerning the
prescription and self-administration of a medication that is
designed to end the life of the patient in accordance with sections
5 to 33, inclusive, of this act to a patient who requests such
information, the attending practitioner must facilitate the
transition of the patient to another provider of health care, unless
the patient refuses such a transition. An attending practitioner
who fails to comply with the requirements of this subsection shall
be deemed to have failed to obtain informed consent to any care
provided to the patient after the request.
3. If a patient requests pursuant to section 18 of this act that
the attending practitioner prescribe a medication that is designed
to end the life of the patient and the attending practitioner is
unwilling or unable to issue a prescription for such medication,
the attending practitioner shall:
(a) Document the request and the date of the request in the
medical record of the patient; and
(b) Upon request, forward the medical records of the patient as
required by subsection 4 of section 24 of this act.
Sec. 32. 1. Except as otherwise required by section 31 of
this act, the owner or operator of a health care facility may
prohibit:
(a) Any employee or independent contractor of the health care
facility from providing any services described in sections 5 to 33,
inclusive, of this act while acting within the scope of his or her
-
*AB346_R1*

– 16 –
employment or contract, as applicable, with the health care
facility; or
(b) Any other person, including, without limitation, an
employee or independent contractor of the health care facility or
another provider of health care who provides services on the
premises of the health care facility, from providing any services
described in sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this act on the premises
of the health care facility.
2. An owner or operator of a health care facility who
prohibits any person from providing services described in sections
5 to 33, inclusive, of this act shall provide notice of the prohibition
to:
(a) Each employee and independent contractor of the health
care facility at the time of hiring and annually thereafter; and
(b) Each provider of health care not described in paragraph
(a) who provides services on the premises of the health care
facility, including, without limitation, through telehealth as
defined in NRS 629.515, at the time the provider of health care
begins providing services on the premises of the health care
facility and annually thereafter.
3. The owner or operator of a health care facility may take
any action authorized by law or authorized pursuant to any
applicable rule, policy, procedure or contract against any person
who provides a service prohibited by the owner or operator in
compliance with subsection 1 while acting within the scope of his
or her employment or contract, as applicable, or on the premises
of the health care facility.
Sec. 33. 1. Except as otherwise provided in section 32 of
this act:
(a) A health care facility or provider of health care shall not:
(1) Prohibit an employee or independent contractor from:
(I) Providing services described in sections 5 to 33,
inclusive, of this act outside the scope of the employment or
contract, as applicable, and off the premises of the health care
facility or any premises owned or operated by the provider of
health care;
(II) Being present when a patient self-administers a
medication that is designed to end the life of the patient outside the
scope of his or her employment or contract, as applicable, and off
the premises of the health care facility or any premises owned or
operated by the provider of health care; or
(III) Providing accurate, scientific information
concerning the diagnosis and prognosis of a patient or options for
the treatment of a terminal condition, including, without
limitation, the administration of a medication that is designed to
-
*AB346_R1*

– 17 –
end the life of a patient, or providing information concerning
available health care services and other resources, including,
without limitation, information about how to access such services
and resources, when discussing the options of the patient for end-
of-life care; or
(2) Discharge, demote, censure, suspend, revoke or suspend
the privileges of, discipline or otherwise penalize an employee or
independent contractor who takes any action described in
subparagraph (1).
(b) A practitioner, person professionally qualified in the field
of psychiatric mental health, pharmacist or other provider of
health care is not subject to professional discipline, does not
violate any applicable standard of care and is not subject to any
civil or criminal penalty solely because the provider of health care:
(1) Takes any action authorized by sections 5 to 33,
inclusive, of this act, including, without limitation, assisting a
patient in preparing a medication that is designed to end the life of
the patient in accordance with subsection 1 of section 26 of this
act; or
(2) Is present when a patient self-administers a medication
that is designed to end the life of the patient or when a patient dies
as a result of such self-administration.
(c) A health care facility is not subject to disciplinary action,
does not violate any applicable standard of care and is not subject
to any civil or criminal penalty solely because an employee or
independent contractor of the health care facility takes any action
authorized by sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this act.
(d) A person other than a provider of health care is not subject
to professional discipline, does not violate any applicable standard
of care and is not subject to any civil or criminal penalty solely
because the person:
(1) Assists a patient in preparing a medication that is
designed to end the life of the patient in accordance with
subsection 1 of section 26 of this act; or
(2) Is present when a patient self-administers a medication
that is designed to end the life of the patient or when a patient dies
as a result of such self-administration.
2. If any part of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 conflicts with
requirements concerning the receipt of federal money by this
State, the conflicting provision does not apply solely to the extent
of the conflict with respect to the health care facility or provider of
health care directly affected.
3. A local government, coroner, law enforcement agency or
an employee of a local government, coroner or law enforcement
agency is not subject to any civil or criminal penalty for ceasing or
-
*AB346_R1*

– 18 –
refusing to investigate or take other action in response to a death
resulting from the self-administration of a medication designed to
end the life of the patient pursuant to sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of
this act or refusing to make a finding concerning such a death.
4. The provisions of this section do not limit liability for
damages resulting from the negligence or intentional misconduct
of any person providing services pursuant to sections 5 to 33,
inclusive, of this act.
Sec. 33.1. NRS 450B.470 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
450B.470 “Qualified patient” means:
1. A patient 18 years of age or older who has been determined
by the patient’s attending physician or attending advanced practice
registered nurse to be in a terminal condition and who:
(a) Has executed a declaration in accordance with the
requirements of NRS 449A.433;
(b) Has executed a Provider Order for Life-Sustaining
Treatment form pursuant to NRS 449A.500 to 449A.581, inclusive,
if the form provides that the patient is not to receive life-
resuscitating treatment; [or]
(c) Has been issued a do-not-resuscitate order pursuant to NRS
450B.510 [.] ; or
(d) Has self-administered a medication that is designed to end
his or her life in accordance with sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this
act.
2. A patient who is less than 18 years of age and who:
(a) Has been determined by the patient’s attending physician or
attending advanced practice registered nurse to be in a terminal
condition; and
(b) Has executed a Provider Order for Life-Sustaining
Treatment form pursuant to NRS 449A.500 to 449A.581, inclusive,
if the form provides that the patient is not to receive life-
resuscitating treatment or has been issued a do-not-resuscitate order
pursuant to NRS 450B.510.
Sec. 33.3. NRS 450B.550 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
450B.550 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a
person who administers emergency medical services shall comply
with do-not-resuscitate protocol when the person observes a do-not-
resuscitate identification or carries out a do-not-resuscitate order.
2. A person who administers emergency medical services and
who is unwilling or unable to comply with the do-not-resuscitate
protocol shall take all reasonable measures to transfer a qualified
patient who possesses a do-not-resuscitate identification or has been
issued a do-not-resuscitate order to a physician, advanced practice
-
*AB346_R1*

– 19 –
registered nurse or health care facility in which the do-not-
resuscitate protocol may be followed.
3. A prescription for a medication that is designed to end the
life of the patient issued in accordance with sections 5 to 33,
inclusive, of this act shall be considered a written do-not-
resuscitate order for the purposes of NRS 450B.400 to 450B.590,
inclusive, if a person who administers emergency medical
services:
(a) Responds to a patient who has self-administered a
medication that is designed to end his or her life; and
(b) Determines that such a prescription has been issued to the
patient.
Sec. 33.6. NRS 450B.570 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
450B.570 1. Death that results when life-resuscitating
treatment has been withheld pursuant to the do-not-resuscitate
protocol and in accordance with the provisions of NRS 450B.400 to
450B.590, inclusive, does not constitute a suicide or homicide.
2. The possession of a do-not-resuscitate identification or the
issuance of a do-not-resuscitate order does not affect the sale,
procurement or issuance of a policy of life insurance or an annuity
or impair or modify the terms of a policy of life insurance or an
annuity. A policy of life insurance or an annuity is not legally
impaired or invalidated if life-resuscitating treatment has been
withheld from an insured who possesses a do-not-resuscitate
identification or has been issued a do-not-resuscitate order,
notwithstanding any term in the policy or annuity to the contrary.
3. A person may not prohibit or require the possession of a do-
not-resuscitate identification or the issuance of a do-not-resuscitate
order as a condition of being insured for, or receiving, health care.
4. A person who administers emergency medical services and
responds to a patient who has self-administered a medication that
is designed to end the life of the patient in accordance with
sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this act shall indicate “medical aid in
dying” in any report concerning the incident created by the person
who administers emergency medical services.
Sec. 34. NRS 453.256 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.256 1. A prescription for a controlled substance must be
given to a pharmacy in compliance with NRS 639.23535. A
prescription for a substance included in schedule II must not be
refilled. A prescription for a substance included in schedule III or IV
which is a dangerous drug as determined under NRS 454.201 must
not be filled or refilled more than 6 months after the date thereof or
be refilled more than five times, unless renewed by the practitioner.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 20 –
2. A substance included in schedule V may be distributed or
dispensed only for a medical purpose, including medical treatment
or authorized research.
3. A practitioner may dispense or deliver a controlled
substance to or for a person or animal only for medical treatment or
authorized research in the ordinary course of his or her profession.
4. No civil or criminal liability or administrative sanction may
be imposed on a pharmacist for action taken in good faith in reliance
on a reasonable belief that an order purporting to be a prescription
was issued by a practitioner in the usual course of professional
treatment or in authorized research.
5. An individual practitioner may not dispense a substance
included in schedule II, III or IV for the practitioner’s own personal
use except in a medical emergency.
6. A person who violates this section is guilty of a category E
felony and shall be punished as provided in NRS 193.130.
7. As used in this section, “medical treatment” includes
[dispensing] :
(a) Dispensing or administering a narcotic drug for pain,
whether or not intractable [.] ; and
(b) Dispensing a medication that is designed to end the life of a
patient pursuant to the provisions of sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 35. NRS 453.375 is hereby amended to read as follows:
453.375 1. [A] Except as otherwise provided in sections 5 to
33, inclusive, of this act, a controlled substance may be possessed
and administered by the following persons:
(a) A practitioner.
(b) A registered nurse licensed to practice professional nursing
or licensed practical nurse, at the direction of a physician, physician
assistant, dentist, podiatric physician or advanced practice registered
nurse, or pursuant to a chart order, for administration to a patient at
another location.
(c) A paramedic:
(1) As authorized by regulation of:
(I) The State Board of Health in a county whose
population is less than 100,000; or
(II) A county or district board of health in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more; and
(2) In accordance with any applicable regulations of:
(I) The State Board of Health in a county whose
population is less than 100,000;
(II) A county board of health in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more; or
-
*AB346_R1*

– 21 –
(III) A district board of health created pursuant to NRS
439.362 or 439.370 in any county.
(d) A respiratory therapist, at the direction of a physician or
physician assistant.
(e) An anesthesiologist assistant, at the direction of a
supervising anesthesiologist or supervising osteopathic
anesthesiologist.
(f) A medical student, student in training to become a physician
assistant or anesthesiologist assistant, student nurse in the course of
his or her studies at an accredited college of medicine or approved
school of professional or practical nursing, at the direction of a
physician or physician assistant and:
(1) In the presence of a physician, physician assistant or a
registered nurse; or
(2) Under the supervision of a physician, physician assistant
or a registered nurse if the student is authorized by the college or
school to administer the substance outside the presence of a
physician, physician assistant or nurse.
 A medical student or student nurse may administer a controlled
substance in the presence or under the supervision of a registered
nurse alone only if the circumstances are such that the registered
nurse would be authorized to administer it personally.
(g) An ultimate user or any person whom the ultimate user
designates pursuant to a written agreement.
(h) Any person designated by the head of a correctional
institution.
(i) A veterinary technician at the direction of his or her
supervising veterinarian.
(j) In accordance with applicable regulations of the State Board
of Health, an employee of a residential facility for groups, as
defined in NRS 449.017, pursuant to a written agreement entered
into by the ultimate user.
(k) In accordance with applicable regulations of the State Board
of Pharmacy, an animal control officer, a wildlife biologist or an
employee designated by a federal, state or local governmental
agency whose duties include the control of domestic, wild and
predatory animals.
(l) A person who is enrolled in a training program to become a
paramedic, respiratory therapist or veterinary technician if the
person possesses and administers the controlled substance in the
same manner and under the same conditions that apply, respectively,
to a paramedic, respiratory therapist or veterinary technician who
may possess and administer the controlled substance, and under the
direct supervision of a person licensed or registered to perform the
respective medical art or a supervisor of such a person.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 22 –
(m) A registered pharmacist pursuant to written guidelines and
protocols developed pursuant to NRS 639.2629 or a collaborative
practice agreement, as defined in NRS 639.0052.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Accredited college of medicine” means:
(1) A medical school that is accredited by the Liaison
Committee on Medical Education of the American Medical
Association and the Association of American Medical Colleges or
their successor organizations; or
(2) A school of osteopathic medicine, as defined in
NRS 633.121.
(b) “Anesthesiologist assistant” means a person who holds a
license issued pursuant to NRS 630.2683 or 633.4254 or a
temporary license issued pursuant to NRS 630.2685 or 633.4262.
Sec. 36. NRS 454.213 is hereby amended to read as follows:
454.213 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 454.217 [,]
and sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this act, a drug or medicine
referred to in NRS 454.181 to 454.371, inclusive, may be possessed
and administered by:
(a) A practitioner.
(b) A physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633
of NRS or an anesthesiologist assistant, at the direction of his or her
supervising physician or supervising anesthesiologist or supervising
osteopathic anesthesiologist, as applicable, or a licensed dental
hygienist or expanded function dental assistant acting in the office
of and under the supervision of a dentist.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d), a registered
nurse licensed to practice professional nursing or licensed practical
nurse, at the direction of a prescribing physician, physician assistant
licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, dentist, podiatric
physician or advanced practice registered nurse, or pursuant to a
chart order, for administration to a patient at another location.
(d) In accordance with applicable regulations of the Board, a
registered nurse licensed to practice professional nursing or licensed
practical nurse who is:
(1) Employed by a health care agency or health care facility
that is authorized to provide emergency care, or to respond to the
immediate needs of a patient, in the residence of the patient; and
(2) Acting under the direction of the medical director of that
agency or facility who works in this State.
(e) A medication aide - certified at a designated facility under
the supervision of an advanced practice registered nurse or
registered nurse and in accordance with standard protocols
developed by the State Board of Nursing. As used in this paragraph,
-
*AB346_R1*

– 23 –
“designated facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 632.0145.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (g), an advanced
emergency medical technician or a paramedic, as authorized by
regulation of the State Board of Pharmacy and in accordance with
any applicable regulations of:
(1) The State Board of Health in a county whose population
is less than 100,000;
(2) A county board of health in a county whose population is
100,000 or more; or
(3) A district board of health created pursuant to NRS
439.362 or 439.370 in any county.
(g) An advanced emergency medical technician or a paramedic
who holds an endorsement issued pursuant to NRS 450B.1975,
under the direct supervision of a local health officer or a designee of
the local health officer pursuant to that section.
(h) A respiratory therapist employed in a health care facility.
The therapist may possess and administer respiratory products only
at the direction of a physician.
(i) A dialysis technician, under the direction or supervision of a
physician or registered nurse only if the drug or medicine is used for
the process of renal dialysis.
(j) A medical student or student nurse in the course of his or her
studies at an accredited college of medicine or approved school of
professional or practical nursing, at the direction of a physician and:
(1) In the presence of a physician or a registered nurse; or
(2) Under the supervision of a physician or a registered nurse
if the student is authorized by the college or school to administer the
drug or medicine outside the presence of a physician or nurse.
 A medical student or student nurse may administer a dangerous
drug in the presence or under the supervision of a registered nurse
alone only if the circumstances are such that the registered nurse
would be authorized to administer it personally.
(k) Any person designated by the head of a correctional
institution.
(l) An ultimate user or any person designated by the ultimate
user pursuant to a written agreement.
(m) A holder of a license to engage in radiation therapy and
radiologic imaging issued pursuant to chapter 653 of NRS, at the
direction of a physician and in accordance with any conditions
established by regulation of the Board.
(n) A chiropractic physician, but only if the drug or medicine is
a topical drug used for cooling and stretching external tissue during
therapeutic treatments.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 24 –
(o) A physical therapist, but only if the drug or medicine is a
topical drug which is:
(1) Used for cooling and stretching external tissue during
therapeutic treatments; and
(2) Prescribed by a licensed physician for:
(I) Iontophoresis; or
(II) The transmission of drugs through the skin using
ultrasound.
(p) In accordance with applicable regulations of the State Board
of Health, an employee of a residential facility for groups, as
defined in NRS 449.017, pursuant to a written agreement entered
into by the ultimate user.
(q) A veterinary technician or a veterinary assistant at the
direction of his or her supervising veterinarian.
(r) In accordance with applicable regulations of the Board, a
registered pharmacist who:
(1) Is trained in and certified to carry out standards and
practices for immunization programs;
(2) Is authorized to administer immunizations pursuant to
written protocols from a physician; and
(3) Administers immunizations in compliance with the
“Standards for Immunization Practices” recommended and
approved by the Advisory Committee on Immunization Practices of
the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
(s) A registered pharmacist pursuant to written guidelines and
protocols developed pursuant to NRS 639.2629 or a collaborative
practice agreement, as defined in NRS 639.0052.
(t) A person who is enrolled in a training program to become a
physician assistant or anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, dental hygienist, advanced emergency
medical technician, paramedic, respiratory therapist, dialysis
technician, physical therapist or veterinary technician or to obtain a
license to engage in radiation therapy and radiologic imaging
pursuant to chapter 653 of NRS if the person possesses and
administers the drug or medicine in the same manner and under the
same conditions that apply, respectively, to a physician assistant or
anesthesiologist assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 630 or 633 of
NRS, dental hygienist, advanced emergency medical technician,
paramedic, respiratory therapist, dialysis technician, physical
therapist, veterinary technician or person licensed to engage in
radiation therapy and radiologic imaging who may possess and
administer the drug or medicine, and under the direct supervision of
a person licensed or registered to perform the respective medical art
or a supervisor of such a person.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 25 –
(u) A medical assistant, in accordance with applicable
regulations of the:
(1) Board of Medical Examiners, at the direction of the
prescribing physician and under the supervision of a physician or
physician assistant.
(2) State Board of Osteopathic Medicine, at the direction of
the prescribing physician and under the supervision of a physician
or physician assistant.
2. As used in this section, “accredited college of medicine” has
the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 453.375.
Sec. 37. NRS 454.215 is hereby amended to read as follows:
454.215 [A] Except as otherwise provided in sections 5 to 33,
inclusive, of this act, a dangerous drug may be dispensed by:
1. A registered pharmacist upon the legal prescription from a
practitioner or to a pharmacy in a correctional institution upon the
written order of the prescribing practitioner in charge;
2. A pharmacy in a correctional institution, in case of
emergency, upon a written order signed by the chief medical officer;
3. A practitioner, or a physician assistant licensed pursuant to
chapter 630 or 633 of NRS if authorized by the Board;
4. A registered nurse, when the nurse is engaged in the
performance of any public health program approved by the Board;
5. A medical intern in the course of his or her internship;
6. An advanced practice registered nurse who holds a
certificate from the State Board of Pharmacy permitting him or her
to dispense dangerous drugs;
7. A registered nurse employed at an institution of the
Department of Corrections to an offender in that institution;
8. A registered pharmacist from an institutional pharmacy
pursuant to regulations adopted by the Board;
9. A manufacturer or wholesaler dispensing a dialysate drug
pursuant to NRS 639.573; or
10. A registered nurse to a patient at a rural clinic that is
designated as such pursuant to NRS 433.233 and that is operated by
the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the Department of
Health and Human Services if the nurse is providing mental health
services at the rural clinic,
 except that no person may dispense a dangerous drug in violation
of a regulation adopted by the Board.
Sec. 38. NRS 133.065 is hereby amended to read as follows:
133.065 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 or
to the extent that it violates public policy, a testator may:
[1.] (a) Make a devise conditional upon a devisee’s action or
failure to take action or upon the occurrence or nonoccurrence of
one or more specified events; and
-
*AB346_R1*

– 26 –
[2.] (b) Specify the conditions or actions which would
disqualify a person from serving or which would constitute cause
for removal of a person who is serving in any capacity under the
will, including, without limitation, as a personal representative,
guardian or trustee.
2. Any provision in a will executed on or after the effective
date of this act that conditions a devise on any person requesting
or failing to request a medication designed to end his or her life,
revoking such a request or self-administering such a medication
in accordance with the provisions of sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of
this act is unenforceable and void.
Sec. 39. NRS 159.054 is hereby amended to read as follows:
159.054 1. If the court finds that the proposed protected
person is not incapacitated and is not in need of a guardian, the court
shall dismiss the petition.
2. If the court finds that the proposed protected person is of
limited capacity and is in need of a special guardian, the court shall
enter an order accordingly and specify the powers and duties of the
special guardian.
3. If the court finds that appointment of a general guardian is
required, the court shall appoint a general guardian of the person,
estate, or person and estate of the proposed protected person.
4. A proposed protected person shall not be deemed to be in
need of a general or special guardian based solely upon a request
by the proposed protected person for a medication that is designed
to end his or her life or the revocation of such a request if made in
accordance with the provisions of sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 40. NRS 239.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
239.010 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 1.4683, 1.4687, 1A.110, 3.2203, 41.0397, 41.071, 49.095,
49.293, 62D.420, 62D.440, 62E.516, 62E.620, 62H.025, 62H.030,
62H.170, 62H.220, 62H.320, 75A.100, 75A.150, 76.160, 78.152,
80.113, 81.850, 82.183, 86.246, 86.54615, 87.515, 87.5413,
87A.200, 87A.580, 87A.640, 88.3355, 88.5927, 88.6067, 88A.345,
88A.7345, 89.045, 89.251, 90.730, 91.160, 116.757, 116A.270,
116B.880, 118B.026, 119.260, 119.265, 119.267, 119.280,
119A.280, 119A.653, 119A.677, 119B.370, 119B.382, 120A.640,
120A.690, 125.130, 125B.140, 126.141, 126.161, 126.163, 126.730,
127.007, 127.057, 127.130, 127.140, 127.2817, 128.090, 130.312,
130.712, 136.050, 159.044, 159A.044, 164.041, 172.075, 172.245,
176.01334, 176.01385, 176.015, 176.0625, 176.09129, 176.156,
176A.630, 178.39801, 178.4715, 178.5691, 178.5717, 179.495,
179A.070, 179A.165, 179D.160, 180.600, 200.3771, 200.3772,
200.5095, 200.604, 202.3662, 205.4651, 209.392, 209.3923,
-
*AB346_R1*

– 27 –
209.3925, 209.419, 209.429, 209.521, 211A.140, 213.010, 213.040,
213.095, 213.131, 217.105, 217.110, 217.464, 217.475, 218A.350,
218E.625, 218F.150, 218G.130, 218G.240, 218G.350, 218G.615,
224.240, 226.462, 226.796, 228.270, 228.450, 228.495, 228.570,
231.069, 231.1285, 231.1473, 232.1369, 233.190, 237.300,
239.0105, 239.0113, 239.014, 239B.026, 239B.030, 239B.040,
239B.050, 239C.140, 239C.210, 239C.230, 239C.250, 239C.270,
239C.420, 240.007, 241.020, 241.030, 241.039, 242.105, 244.264,
244.335, 247.540, 247.545, 247.550, 247.560, 250.087, 250.130,
250.140, 250.145, 250.150, 268.095, 268.0978, 268.490, 268.910,
269.174, 271A.105, 281.195, 281.805, 281A.350, 281A.680,
281A.685, 281A.750, 281A.755, 281A.780, 284.4068, 284.4086,
286.110, 286.118, 287.0438, 289.025, 289.080, 289.387, 289.830,
293.4855, 293.5002, 293.503, 293.504, 293.558, 293.5757, 293.870,
293.906, 293.908, 293.909, 293.910, 293B.135, 293D.510, 331.110,
332.061, 332.351, 333.333, 333.335, 338.070, 338.1379, 338.1593,
338.1725, 338.1727, 348.420, 349.597, 349.775, 353.205,
353A.049, 353A.085, 353A.100, 353C.240, 353D.250, 360.240,
360.247, 360.255, 360.755, 361.044, 361.2242, 361.610, 365.138,
366.160, 368A.180, 370.257, 370.327, 372A.080, 378.290, 378.300,
379.0075, 379.008, 379.1495, 385A.830, 385B.100, 387.626,
387.631, 388.1455, 388.259, 388.501, 388.503, 388.513, 388.750,
388A.247, 388A.249, 391.033, 391.035, 391.0365, 391.120,
391.925, 392.029, 392.147, 392.264, 392.271, 392.315, 392.317,
392.325, 392.327, 392.335, 392.850, 393.045, 394.167, 394.16975,
394.1698, 394.447, 394.460, 394.465, 396.1415, 396.1425, 396.143,
396.159, 396.3295, 396.405, 396.525, 396.535, 396.9685,
398A.115, 408.3885, 408.3886, 408.3888, 408.5484, 412.153,
414.280, 416.070, 422.2749, 422.305, 422A.342, 422A.350,
425.400, 427A.1236, 427A.872, 427A.940, 432.028, 432.205,
432B.175, 432B.280, 432B.290, 432B.4018, 432B.407, 432B.430,
432B.560, 432B.5902, 432C.140, 432C.150, 433.534, 433A.360,
439.4941, 439.4988, 439.5282, 439.840, 439.914, 439A.116,
439A.124, 439B.420, 439B.754, 439B.760, 439B.845, 440.170,
441A.195, 441A.220, 441A.230, 442.330, 442.395, 442.735,
442.774, 445A.665, 445B.570, 445B.7773, 449.209, 449.245,
449.4315, 449A.112, 450.140, 450B.188, 450B.805, 453.164,
453.720, 458.055, 458.280, 459.050, 459.3866, 459.555, 459.7056,
459.846, 463.120, 463.15993, 463.240, 463.3403, 463.3407,
463.790, 467.1005, 480.535, 480.545, 480.935, 480.940, 481.063,
481.091, 481.093, 482.170, 482.368, 482.5536, 483.340, 483.363,
483.575, 483.659, 483.800, 484A.469, 484B.830, 484B.833,
484E.070, 485.316, 501.344, 503.452, 522.040, 534A.031, 561.285,
571.160, 584.655, 587.877, 598.0964, 598.098, 598A.110,
598A.420, 599B.090, 603.070, 603A.210, 604A.303, 604A.710,
-
*AB346_R1*

– 28 –
604D.500, 604D.600, 612.265, 616B.012, 616B.015, 616B.315,
616B.350, 618.341, 618.425, 622.238, 622.310, 623.131, 623A.137,
624.110, 624.265, 624.327, 625.425, 625A.185, 628.418, 628B.230,
628B.760, 629.043, 629.047, 629.069, 630.133, 630.2671,
630.2672, 630.2673, 630.2687, 630.30665, 630.336, 630A.327,
630A.555, 631.332, 631.368, 632.121, 632.125, 632.3415,
632.3423, 632.405, 633.283, 633.301, 633.427, 633.4715, 633.4716,
633.4717, 633.524, 634.055, 634.1303, 634.214, 634A.169,
634A.185, 634B.730, 635.111, 635.158, 636.262, 636.342, 637.085,
637.145, 637B.192, 637B.288, 638.087, 638.089, 639.183,
639.2485, 639.570, 640.075, 640.152, 640A.185, 640A.220,
640B.405, 640B.730, 640C.580, 640C.600, 640C.620, 640C.745,
640C.760, 640D.135, 640D.190, 640E.225, 640E.340, 641.090,
641.221, 641.2215, 641A.191, 641A.217, 641A.262, 641B.170,
641B.281, 641B.282, 641C.455, 641C.760, 641D.260, 641D.320,
642.524, 643.189, 644A.870, 645.180, 645.625, 645A.050,
645A.082, 645B.060, 645B.092, 645C.220, 645C.225, 645D.130,
645D.135, 645G.510, 645H.320, 645H.330, 647.0945, 647.0947,
648.033, 648.197, 649.065, 649.067, 652.126, 652.228, 653.900,
654.110, 656.105, 657A.510, 661.115, 665.130, 665.133, 669.275,
669.285, 669A.310, 670B.680, 671.365, 671.415, 673.450, 673.480,
675.380, 676A.340, 676A.370, 677.243, 678A.470, 678C.710,
678C.800, 679B.122, 679B.124, 679B.152, 679B.159, 679B.190,
679B.285, 679B.690, 680A.270, 681A.440, 681B.260, 681B.410,
681B.540, 683A.0873, 685A.077, 686A.289, 686B.170, 686C.306,
687A.060, 687A.115, 687B.404, 687C.010, 688C.230, 688C.480,
688C.490, 689A.696, 692A.117, 692C.190, 692C.3507, 692C.3536,
692C.3538, 692C.354, 692C.420, 693A.480, 693A.615, 696B.550,
696C.120, 703.196, 704B.325, 706.1725, 706A.230, 710.159,
711.600, and section 27 of this act, sections 35, 38 and 41 of
chapter 478, Statutes of Nevada 2011 and section 2 of chapter 391,
Statutes of Nevada 2013 and unless otherwise declared by law to be
confidential, all public books and public records of a governmental
entity must be open at all times during office hours to inspection by
any person, and may be fully copied or an abstract or memorandum
may be prepared from those public books and public records. Any
such copies, abstracts or memoranda may be used to supply the
general public with copies, abstracts or memoranda of the records or
may be used in any other way to the advantage of the governmental
entity or of the general public. This section does not supersede or in
any manner affect the federal laws governing copyrights or enlarge,
diminish or affect in any other manner the rights of a person in any
written book or record which is copyrighted pursuant to federal law.
2. A governmental entity may not reject a book or record
which is copyrighted solely because it is copyrighted.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 29 –
3. A governmental entity that has legal custody or control of a
public book or record shall not deny a request made pursuant to
subsection 1 to inspect or copy or receive a copy of a public book or
record on the basis that the requested public book or record contains
information that is confidential if the governmental entity can
redact, delete, conceal or separate, including, without limitation,
electronically, the confidential information from the information
included in the public book or record that is not otherwise
confidential.
4. If requested, a governmental entity shall provide a copy of a
public record in an electronic format by means of an electronic
medium. Nothing in this subsection requires a governmental entity
to provide a copy of a public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium if:
(a) The public record:
(1) Was not created or prepared in an electronic format; and
(2) Is not available in an electronic format; or
(b) Providing the public record in an electronic format or by
means of an electronic medium would:
(1) Give access to proprietary software; or
(2) Require the production of information that is confidential
and that cannot be redacted, deleted, concealed or separated from
information that is not otherwise confidential.
5. An officer, employee or agent of a governmental entity who
has legal custody or control of a public record:
(a) Shall not refuse to provide a copy of that public record in the
medium that is requested because the officer, employee or agent has
already prepared or would prefer to provide the copy in a different
medium.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.030, shall, upon
request, prepare the copy of the public record and shall not require
the person who has requested the copy to prepare the copy himself
or herself.
Sec. 41. NRS 259.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
259.010 1. Every county in this State constitutes a coroner’s
district, except a county where a coroner is appointed pursuant to
the provisions of NRS 244.163.
2. The provisions of this chapter, except NRS 259.025,
259.045, 259.047, 259.049, subsections [3] 4 and [4] 5 of NRS
259.050, NRS 259.053 and 259.150 to 259.180, inclusive, do not
apply to any county where a coroner is appointed pursuant to the
provisions of NRS 244.163.
Sec. 42. NRS 259.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
259.050 1. When a coroner or the coroner’s deputy is
informed that a person has been killed, has committed suicide or has
-
*AB346_R1*

– 30 –
suddenly died under such circumstances as to afford reasonable
ground to suspect that the death has been occasioned by unnatural
means, the coroner shall make an appropriate investigation.
2. When a coroner or the coroner’s deputy is informed or
otherwise discovers that a person has self-administered a
medication designed to end his or her life pursuant to sections 5 to
33, inclusive, of this act, the coroner:
(a) May make an appropriate investigation to the extent
necessary to determine that the cause of the terminal condition
with which the person was diagnosed; and
(b) Must cease investigating the death after determining that
the terminal condition with which the person was diagnosed
resulted from a natural cause.
3. In all cases where it is apparent or can be reasonably inferred
that the death may have been caused by a criminal act, the coroner
or the coroner’s deputy shall notify the district attorney of the
county where the inquiry is made, and the district attorney shall
make an investigation with the assistance of the coroner. If the
sheriff is not ex officio the coroner, the coroner shall also notify the
sheriff, and the district attorney and sheriff shall make
the investigation with the assistance of the coroner.
[3.] 4. If it is apparent to or can be reasonably inferred by the
coroner that a death may have been caused by drug use or
poisoning, the coroner shall cause a postmortem examination to be
performed on the decedent by a forensic pathologist unless the death
occurred following a hospitalization stay of 24 hours or more.
[4.] 5. A coroner may issue a subpoena for the production of
any document, record or material that is directly related or believed
to contain evidence related to an investigation by the coroner.
[5.] 6. The holding of a coroner’s inquest is within the sound
discretion of the district attorney or district judge of the county. An
inquest need not be conducted in any case of death manifestly
occasioned by natural cause, suicide, accident, motor vehicle crash
or when it is publicly known that the death was caused by a person
already in custody, but an inquest must be held unless the district
attorney or a district judge certifies that no inquest is required.
[6.] 7. If an inquest is to be held, the district attorney shall call
upon a justice of the peace of the county to preside over it. The
justice of the peace shall summon three persons qualified by law to
serve as jurors, to appear before the justice of the peace forthwith at
the place where the body is or such other place within the county as
may be designated by him or her to inquire into the cause of death.
[7.] 8. A single inquest may be held with respect to more than
one death, where all the deaths were occasioned by a common
cause.
-
*AB346_R1*

– 31 –
Sec. 43. NRS 639.238 is hereby amended to read as follows:
639.238 1. Prescriptions filled and on file in a pharmacy are
not a public record. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 439.597
and 639.2357, and section 27 of this act, a pharmacist shall not
divulge the contents of any prescription or provide a copy of any
prescription, except to:
(a) The patient for whom the original prescription was issued;
(b) The practitioner who originally issued the prescription;
(c) A practitioner who is then treating the patient;
(d) A member, inspector or investigator of the Board or an
inspector of the Food and Drug Administration or an agent of the
Investigation Division of the Department of Public Safety;
(e) An agency of state government charged with the
responsibility of providing medical care for the patient;
(f) An insurance carrier, on receipt of written authorization
signed by the patient or his or her legal guardian, authorizing the
release of such information;
(g) Any person authorized by an order of a district court;
(h) Any member, inspector or investigator of a professional
licensing board which licenses a practitioner who orders
prescriptions filled at the pharmacy;
(i) Other registered pharmacists for the limited purpose of and to
the extent necessary for the exchange of information relating to
persons who are suspected of:
(1) Misusing prescriptions to obtain excessive amounts of
drugs; or
(2) Failing to use a drug in conformity with the directions for
its use or taking a drug in combination with other drugs in a manner
that could result in injury to that person;
(j) A peace officer employed by a local government for the
limited purpose of and to the extent necessary:
(1) For the investigation of an alleged crime reported by an
employee of the pharmacy where the crime was committed; or
(2) To carry out a search warrant or subpoena issued
pursuant to a court order; or
(k) A county coroner, medical examiner or investigator
employed by an office of a county coroner for the purpose of:
(1) Identifying a deceased person;
(2) Determining a cause of death; or
(3) Performing other duties authorized by law.
2. Any copy of a prescription for a controlled substance or a
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS that is issued to a
county coroner, medical examiner or investigator employed by an
office of a county coroner must be limited to a copy of the
prescription filled or on file for:
-
*AB346_R1*

– 32 –
(a) The person whose name is on the container of the controlled
substance or dangerous drug that is found on or near the body of a
deceased person; or
(b) The deceased person whose cause of death is being
determined.
3. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 639.2357, any copy of
a prescription for a controlled substance or a dangerous drug as
defined in chapter 454 of NRS, issued to a person authorized by this
section to receive such a copy, must contain all of the information
appearing on the original prescription and be clearly marked on its
face “Copy, Not Refillable—For Reference Purposes Only.” The
copy must bear the name or initials of the registered pharmacist who
prepared the copy.
4. If a copy of a prescription for any controlled substance or a
dangerous drug as defined in chapter 454 of NRS is furnished to the
customer, the original prescription must be voided and notations
made thereon showing the date and the name of the person to whom
the copy was furnished.
5. As used in this section, “peace officer” does not include:
(a) A member of the Police Department of the Nevada System
of Higher Education.
(b) A school police officer who is appointed or employed
pursuant to NRS 391.281.
Sec. 44. Chapter 688A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer shall not deny a claim under a policy of life
insurance or annuity contract, cancel a policy of life insurance or
annuity contract or impose an additional charge on a policyholder
or beneficiary solely because the insured has, in accordance with
the provisions of sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this act, requested a
medication designed to end the life of the insured, revoked such a
request or self-administered such a medication.
2. Any provision of a policy of life insurance or annuity
contract that, in conflict with the provisions of this section, allows
the denial of a claim or cancellation of the policy or contract and
which is included in a policy or contract that has been or is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed before, on or after the
effective date of this act is void and unenforceable.
Sec. 45. Chapter 688B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer shall not deny a claim under a policy of group
life insurance, cancel a policy of group life insurance or impose
an additional charge on a policyholder or beneficiary solely
because the insured has, in accordance with the provisions of
sections 5 to 33, inclusive, of this act, requested a medication
-
*AB346_R1*

– 33 –
designed to end the life of the insured, revoked such a request or
self-administered such a medication.
2. Any provision of a policy of group life insurance that, in
conflict with the provisions of this section, allows the denial of a
claim or cancellation of the policy and which is included in a
policy that has been or is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed
before, on or after the effective date of this act is void and
unenforceable.
Sec. 46. NRS 688B.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
688B.040 No policy of group life insurance shall be delivered
in this State unless it contains in substance the provisions set forth in
NRS 688B.040 to 688B.150, inclusive, and section 45 of this act or
provisions which in the opinion of the Commissioner are more
favorable to the persons insured, or at least as favorable to the
persons insured and more favorable to the policyholder; except:
1. NRS 688B.100 to 688B.140, inclusive, do not apply to
policies issued to a creditor to insure debtors of such creditor;
2. The standard provisions required for individual life
insurance policies do not apply to group life insurance policies; and
3. If the group life insurance policy is on a plan of insurance
other than the term plan, it shall contain a nonforfeiture provision or
provisions which in the opinion of the Commissioner is or are
equitable to the insured persons and to the policyholder; but nothing
in this subsection shall be construed to require that group life
insurance policies contain the same nonforfeiture provisions as are
required for individual life insurance policies.
Sec. 47. Not later than 45 days after the effective date of this
act, the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the Department
of Health and Human Services shall prescribe and make available
on an Internet website maintained by the Division the forms for
making the reports required by section 27 of this act.
Sec. 48. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
H
-
*AB346_R1*